Florida, session 2026, SB44.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âPresent subsections (5) through (9) of section 11 119.07, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 12 through (10), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to 13 that section, to read: 14 119.07âInspection and copying of records; photographing 15 public records; fees; exemptions.â 16 (5)âAn agency shall provide an electronic option for the 17 payment of any fee associated with a request to inspect or copy 18 public records. 19 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.